Washington statutes.
RCW 16.38.020

Director authorized to carry on diagnostic program.

The director of agriculture is hereby authorized to carry on a diagnostic service program for the purpose of diagnosing any livestock disease which affects or may affect any livestock which is or may be produced in this state or otherwise handled in any manner for public distribution or consumption.

[ 1969 c 100 s 2.]